Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Uncountable.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM+CJ +NOM+ACC+ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT+GEN+ABL
LEXICON Root
NounUncountableStem;

LEXICON NounUncountable

+N+RT: #;
+N+RT+UN+NOM: #;
+N+RT+UN+ACC: #;
+N+RT+UN+NOM+CJ:ත් #;
+N+RT+UN+ACC+CJ:ත් #;
+N+RT+UN+NOM+FN:යි #;
+N+RT+UN+ACC+FN:යි #;
+N+RT+UN+INT:වලින් #;
+N+RT+UN+ABL:වලින් #;
+N+RT+UN+INT+CJ:වලිනුත් #;
+N+RT+UN+ABL+CJ:වලිනුත් #:
+N+RT+UN+INT+FN:වලිනි #;
+N+RT+UN+ABL+FN:වලිනි #;
+N+RT+UN+DAT:වලට #;
+N+RT+UN+DAT+CJ:වලටත් #;
+N+RT+UN+DAT+FN:වලටයි #;
+N+RT+UN+GEN:වල #;
+N+RT+UN+LOC:වල #;
+N+RT+UN+GEN+CJ:වලත් #;
+N+RT+UN+LOC+CJ:වලත් #;
+N+RT+UN+GEN+FN:වලයි #;
+N+RT+UN+LOC+FN:වලයි #;

LEXICON NounUncountableStem
අත්තික්කා	NounUncountable;
අන්නාසි	NounUncountable;
අනුරූ	NounUncountable;
අබිං	NounUncountable;
අරළු	NounUncountable;
අළු	NounUncountable;
අළුවා	NounUncountable;
ආඩාතෝඩා	NounUncountable;
ආනමාළු	NounUncountable;
ආස්මි	NounUncountable;
ඇටමිදුලු	NounUncountable;
ඉන්ධන	NounUncountable;
ඉසකේ	NounUncountable;
ඍණ	NounUncountable;
එරබදු	NounUncountable;
එළවළු	NounUncountable;
කම්කටුලු	NounUncountable;
කරවළ	NounUncountable;
කවඩි	NounUncountable;
කැකුණ	NounUncountable;
කැලරි	NounUncountable;
කිරි	NounUncountable;
කුප්පමේනිය	NounUncountable;
කුසතණ	NounUncountable;
කේජු	NounUncountable;
කේසර	NounUncountable;
කොට්ඨාස	NounUncountable;
කොත්තමල්ලි	NounUncountable;
කොමඩු	NounUncountable;
කෝපි	NounUncountable;
ගුටිබැට	NounUncountable;
ගෝවා	NounUncountable;
ටින්වල	NounUncountable;
තඹ	NounUncountable;
තාර	NounUncountable;
තිරිවාණා	NounUncountable;
තුත්තිරි	NounUncountable;
තුෂාර	NounUncountable;
තෙලිඟු	NounUncountable;
තේ	NounUncountable;
දඹල	NounUncountable;
දහයියා	NounUncountable;
දෝසි	NounUncountable;
නෂ්ටාවශේෂ	NounUncountable;
නිර්යාත	NounUncountable;
නෙරළු	NounUncountable;
පත්ල	NounUncountable;
පරඬලා	NounUncountable;
පසුරූ	NounUncountable;
පාසි	NounUncountable;
පැපොල	NounUncountable;
පිණි	NounUncountable;
පිපිඤ්ඤා	NounUncountable;
පිළි	NounUncountable;
පෙඳ	NounUncountable;
පොරි	NounUncountable;
පෝලියෝ	NounUncountable;
බතල	NounUncountable;
බැර	NounUncountable;
බුදුගුණ	NounUncountable;
බොර	NounUncountable;
බෝංචි	NounUncountable;
මකරි	NounUncountable;
මලමුත්‍ර	NounUncountable;
මැයි	NounUncountable;
මිණිමුතු	NounUncountable;
මිදි	NounUncountable;
මීන	NounUncountable;
මුකුණුවැන්න	NounUncountable;
මුනිබණ	NounUncountable;
මුසලඩි	NounUncountable;
මේෂ	NounUncountable;
යසුණු	NounUncountable;
රත්‍රං	NounUncountable;
රතුලූනු	NounUncountable;
රසදිය	NounUncountable;
රිදී	NounUncountable;
රුලං	NounUncountable;
රෙදිපිළි	NounUncountable;
ලාදුරු	NounUncountable;
ලී	NounUncountable;
වක්කඩ	NounUncountable;
වට්ටක්කා	NounUncountable;
වදුල	NounUncountable;
වනවදුල	NounUncountable;
වසර	NounUncountable;
වළාකුළු	NounUncountable;
වාසල	NounUncountable;
වැටකොළු	NounUncountable;
වැරහැල්ල	NounUncountable;
වැලි	NounUncountable;
වැළ	NounUncountable;
විල්ලුද	NounUncountable;
විසුළු	NounUncountable;
වෙරළ	NounUncountable;
වෙළඳසැල	NounUncountable;
වොඩ්කා	NounUncountable;
සත්තුවත්ත	NounUncountable;
සරම්ප	NounUncountable;
සාදික්කා	NounUncountable;
සුළං	NounUncountable;
සූදුපළ	NounUncountable;
සෙවල	NounUncountable;
හාරත	NounUncountable;
හේර	NounUncountable;
හොරි	NounUncountable;
ගස්වැල්	NounUncountable;
ආහාරපාන	NounUncountable;
කාඩ්	NounUncountable;
කැරළි	NounUncountable;
චොක්ලට්	NounUncountable;
ඩීසල්	NounUncountable;
දූවිලි	NounUncountable;
පොකාරා	NounUncountable;
සැල්	NounUncountable;
හැලහැප්පීම්	NounUncountable;
අගුරු	NounUncountable;
අලෝහ	NounUncountable;
ආයිත්තම්	NounUncountable;
ඇදහිලි	NounUncountable;
ඇසිඩ්	NounUncountable;
ඉටිරෙදි	NounUncountable;
එංජින්	NounUncountable;
එපාකම්	NounUncountable;
ඒඩ්ස්	NounUncountable;
ඔන්ලයින්	NounUncountable;
කඩපිල්	NounUncountable;
කම්කටොළු	NounUncountable;
කැරැලි	NounUncountable;
කිමිදුම්	NounUncountable;
කිරිපිටි	NounUncountable;
කොක්ටේල්	NounUncountable;
කොහු	NounUncountable;
කෝපි	NounUncountable;
ගම්බිම්	NounUncountable;
ගෙවතු	NounUncountable;
චිත්රර	NounUncountable;
ටියුෂන්	NounUncountable;
දුසිරිත්	NounUncountable;
නන්දිකඩාල්	NounUncountable;
නාරං	NounUncountable;
පැකට්	NounUncountable;
පිඟන්	NounUncountable;
පිටිකිරි	NounUncountable;
පෙට්‍රල්	NounUncountable;
පොලිතින්	NounUncountable;
බතික්	NounUncountable;
බැසෝල්ට්	NounUncountable;
බිස්කට්	NounUncountable;
බෝඩ්	NounUncountable;
මැච්	NounUncountable;
මැෂින්	NounUncountable;
යදම්	NounUncountable;
රසකැවිලි	NounUncountable;
රූකම්	NounUncountable;
රෝසමල්	NounUncountable;
ලූණු	NounUncountable;
ලොම්	NounUncountable;
වසුරු	NounUncountable;
වැටවල්	NounUncountable;
ෂෙඩ්	NounUncountable;
සිගරට්	NounUncountable;
ෆෘට්	NounUncountable;
හීත්‍රෝ	NounUncountable;
අකටයුතු	NounUncountable;
අගනඟර	NounUncountable;
අඟපසඟ	NounUncountable;
අඩදබර	NounUncountable;
අඩම්තේට්ටම්	NounUncountable;
අඩුවයස්	NounUncountable;
අත්අකුරු	NounUncountable;
අධිකාරියේවැටලීම්	NounUncountable;
අන්නාසි	NounUncountable;
අපහසුකම්	NounUncountable;
අපේ‍්‍රල්	NounUncountable;
අබලිද්‍රව්‍ය	NounUncountable;
අරුචිකම්	NounUncountable;
අවහිරකම්	NounUncountable;
අව්වැසි	NounUncountable;
අෆාමෝසා	NounUncountable;
ආරංචිමාර්ග	NounUncountable;
ආසනික්	NounUncountable;
ඇටකටු	NounUncountable;
ඇත්දැකීම්	NounUncountable;
ඇන්ටිල්ස්	NounUncountable;
ඇන්යෑංග්	NounUncountable;
ඇලුමිනියම්	NounUncountable;
ඇසිට්ලීන්	NounUncountable;
ඇළදොල	NounUncountable;
ඉටි	NounUncountable;
ඉතුරුම්	NounUncountable;
ඉන්වොයිස්	NounUncountable;
ඉපනැලි	NounUncountable;
ඉසෙඩ්	NounUncountable;
ඊම්	NounUncountable;
උන්හිටිතැන්	NounUncountable;
උපබස්	NounUncountable;
එතනෝල්	NounUncountable;
එලවලු	NounUncountable;
ඔද්දල්	NounUncountable;
කක්ෂීය	NounUncountable;
කටොළු	NounUncountable;
කඳුහෙල්	NounUncountable;
කඹුරු	NounUncountable;
කරවිල	NounUncountable;
කවටකම්	NounUncountable;
කහවණු	NounUncountable;
කාපට්	NounUncountable;
කැදැලි	NounUncountable;
කැළඹිලි	NounUncountable;
කිරිඳි	NounUncountable;
කුරුදු	NounUncountable;
කෘෂිබිම්	NounUncountable;
කෙනහිලිකම්	NounUncountable;
කොත්තමල්ලි	NounUncountable;
කොමිෂන්	NounUncountable;
කොයිල්	NounUncountable;
කෝළාහල	NounUncountable;
ක්වයිස්තනීස්	NounUncountable;
ක්ෂේත්රද	NounUncountable;
ගජමුතු	NounUncountable;
ගමන්මලු	NounUncountable;
ගල්කඩ	NounUncountable;
ගස්ලබු	NounUncountable;
ගැරහුම්	NounUncountable;
ගිරිහෙල්	NounUncountable;
ගොටුකොළ	NounUncountable;
ග්‍රැෆයිට්	NounUncountable;
චාරිත‍්‍රවිධි	NounUncountable;
ජර්නලිසම්	NounUncountable;
ජීිවිත	NounUncountable;
ටියුබ්	NounUncountable;
ටෙලිවිෂන්	NounUncountable;
ඩයොක්සයිට්	NounUncountable;
ත‍ටු	NounUncountable;
තනතරු	NounUncountable;
තරුපටි	NounUncountable;
තානාපතිකාර්යාල	NounUncountable;
තිරූ	NounUncountable;
තොටු	NounUncountable;
තොරුතුරු	NounUncountable;
තෝරියම්	NounUncountable;
දඩපත්	NounUncountable;
දියමංකඩ	NounUncountable;
දුක්ගැහැට	NounUncountable;
දුෂ්ඨකම්	NounUncountable;
දෙවිදුහල්	NounUncountable;
දේවාලගම්	NounUncountable;
නහරවැල්	NounUncountable;
නිතීරිති	NounUncountable;
නීතිරිති	NounUncountable;
පටස්	NounUncountable;
පන්වර්ග	NounUncountable;
පර්ණාංග	NounUncountable;
පවර්සෙට්	NounUncountable;
පහත්බිම්	NounUncountable;
පානල්	NounUncountable;
පැමිණිළි	NounUncountable;
පැරිස්	NounUncountable;
පැළදුම්	NounUncountable;
පිදුරු	NounUncountable;
පියැසි	NounUncountable;
පිහුම්	NounUncountable;
පුද්ගලාර්ථ	NounUncountable;
පුහු	NounUncountable;
පෙට්‍රෝලියම්	NounUncountable;
පෙරපාසල්	NounUncountable;
පොච්චි	NounUncountable;
පොලිතීන්	NounUncountable;
ප්‍රකාශද	NounUncountable;
ප්‍රතිගෙවීම්	NounUncountable;
ප්රයතිමා	NounUncountable;
බඩඉරිගු	NounUncountable;
බළසේනාංක	NounUncountable;
බැනුම්	NounUncountable;
බිතු	NounUncountable;
බිස්නස්	NounUncountable;
බුළු	NounUncountable;
බේගල්	NounUncountable;
බෝඩිං	NounUncountable;
බ්‍රිස්බන්	NounUncountable;
මංවාවත්	NounUncountable;
මනාටි	NounUncountable;
මළපහ	NounUncountable;
මැටිරූප	NounUncountable;
මිදුළු	NounUncountable;
මීතේන්	NounUncountable;
මුරකාවල්	NounUncountable;
මුල්ලිය	NounUncountable;
යන්ත්‍රසූත්‍ර	NounUncountable;
යුධෝපක්‍රම	NounUncountable;
රටඉඳි	NounUncountable;
රනිස්	NounUncountable;
රිකිලි	NounUncountable;
රුධිරානු	NounUncountable;
රෝල්ස්	NounUncountable;
ලාදුරු	NounUncountable;
ලිගන	NounUncountable;
ලෙඩරෝග	NounUncountable;
වංසකතා	NounUncountable;
වදබන්ධන	NounUncountable;
වාදවිවාද	NounUncountable;
විකුණුම්	NounUncountable;
විලවුන්	NounUncountable;
වෙඩිබෙහෙත්	NounUncountable;
වෙසක්	NounUncountable;
වෛද්‍යප්‍රතිකාර	NounUncountable;
ව්ට්ර්‍ණ	NounUncountable;
ශැලොට්	NounUncountable;
ෂීට්	NounUncountable;
සංතෝසම්	NounUncountable;
සන්සිද්ධීන්	NounUncountable;
සලසුම්	NounUncountable;
සාරානාත්	NounUncountable;
සැල්විනියා	NounUncountable;
සිතැඟි	NounUncountable;
සිප්පිකටු	NounUncountable;
සීනිබෝල	NounUncountable;
සුලං	NounUncountable;
සෙට්	NounUncountable;
සේලයින්	NounUncountable;
ස්ටේජ්	NounUncountable;
ෆැරඩ්	NounUncountable;
ෆ්ලෑෂ්	NounUncountable;
හර්යානා	NounUncountable;
හැම්ප්ෂයර්	NounUncountable;
හිමොග්ලොබින්	NounUncountable;
හොස්ටල්	NounUncountable;
